District of Columbia statutes.
51-120

Disposition of fines.

The amount of all fines collected pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter shall be turned over to the Director and by the Director paid into the District Unemployment Fund.

History

Aug. 28, 1935, 49 Stat. 956, ch. 794, § 19
renumbered § 20, June 4, 1943, 57 Stat. 124, ch. 117, § 1
Sept. 24, 1993, D.C. Law 10-15, § 218, 40 DCR 5420

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 46-121.
1973 Ed., § 46-320.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 218 of District of Columbia Unemployment Compensation Comprehensive Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-260, March 27, 1993, law notification 40 DCR 2330).